Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 8

Purchase and Sale of Railroads

65-8-101. Power to acquire and operate other railroads.

Every railroad corporation in this state, and railroad companies existing under the joint legislation of this and another state or states, and railroad companies incorporated by this, or another or other state or states, whose roads connect with, or intersect each other in this or any other state, and all railroad corporations created in this state, or by virtue of statutes of any other state, ratified and confirmed by the authority of this state, has the power to acquire, by purchase or other lawful contract, and have, hold, use, and operate, any railroad, with its franchises, belonging to any other railroad corporation; and likewise to have, hold, use, and operate any such railroad, with its franchises, which it may have purchased or acquired.

Acts 1871, ch. 22, § 1; 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1875, ch. 51, § 1; 1877, ch. 72, § 1; Shan., § 1509; mod. Code 1932, § 2580; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-801.

Cross-References. Acquisition of branches and extensions, § 65-6-130.

Authorization by stockholders, § 65-6-101.

Foreign companies, right to purchase and hold realty, § 65-6-114.

65-8-102. Borrowing money for payment — Issuance of bonds.

Any railroad company described in § 65-8-101 shall have the power to borrow money and to issue its bonds therefor, or for any other indebtedness or liability which it may incur, or may have incurred, in the exercise of its lawful purposes, and to secure the payment of such bonds, with the interest thereon, by a mortgage of the whole or any part of its railroad and equipment and other property and franchises, containing such provisions as its directors shall approve.

Acts 1871, ch. 22, § 3; 1871, ch. 69, § 1; Shan., § 1510; Code 1932, § 2581; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-802.

Cross-References. Authorization by stockholders, § 65-6-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 53.

65-8-103. Continuation of business by seller to wind up business.

In case the railroad company, whose corporate powers have been transferred by a sale as aforementioned, has brought suits in law or equity, or holds any claims or rights of action, excepted and reserved by the terms of the sale, the corporation may have a continuance sufficiently long for the purpose of collecting the claims and paying to or dividing the same among the stockholders or the persons entitled to such claims.

Acts 1871, ch. 22, § 2; Shan., § 1510a1; Code 1932, § 2582; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-803.

65-8-104. Authority to purchase under judicial sale.

Any railroad corporation which has been created, or whose corporate existence has been recognized, by any act of the general assembly, is empowered to become a purchaser of any railroad sold in this or any adjoining state under any judicial proceeding in such state, or sold by any person who may have purchased or derived title under or from any such judicial sale.

Acts 1877, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 1511; Code 1932, § 2583; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-804.

65-8-105. Rights of purchase under judicial sale.

All the rights, privileges, and immunities appertaining to the franchises sold under judicial proceedings instituted against delinquent railroads by the state, under the act of incorporation and the amendments thereto, and the general internal improvement law of the state, and acts amendatory thereof, shall be transferred to, and vest in, the purchaser.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 23, § 10; Shan. § 1512; mod. Code 1932, § 2584; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-805.

65-8-106. Sale under mortgage.

The purchasers of any railroad chartered by this state, and lying in whole or in part in this state, sold under any mortgage executed by it, when put in possession of the railroad by any court of competent jurisdiction, shall have the same right to operate the same in this state as the incorporated company which executed the mortgage.

When a mortgage executed, as provided or allowed by law, upon the franchises and property, of every description of an incorporated railroad lying within the state, either in whole or in part, shall be foreclosed in any court of this state or of the United States having jurisdiction thereof, by sale under the mortgage, the purchasers at the sale shall, by virtue thereof, be entitled to and be invested with the franchises and property, and with all the rights, privileges, and immunities appertaining thereto by the laws of this state, in the act of incorporation of the company, and the amendments thereto, and the general internal improvement law, or other laws of this state, in as full a manner as the company or companies are or were.

Acts 1877, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 1513, 1514; Code 1932, §§ 2585, 2588; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-806, 65-808.

65-8-107. Sale under judgment.

Whenever the property and franchises of any railroad are sold, under any judgment, decree, or process from any of the courts of record of this state, for the payment of any debt due from the incorporated company, the purchasers at the sale, or their assignees, may organize into a corporate body, with the right to have, hold, and operate the property and franchises so purchased, with all powers, rights, privileges, and immunities, and subject to all the restrictions, imposed by the original charter, and amendments thereto, of the corporation whose property and franchises have been sold.

Acts 1879, ch. 52, § 2; Shan., § 1513a; Code 1932, § 2586; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-807.

65-8-108. Right of purchaser to tax exemption waived.

Nothing in § 65-8-106, § 65-8-107 or § 65-10-112 shall be construed to exempt the railroad and its property from liability to state, county, and municipal taxation; and the purchasers shall waive any right of exemption from taxation, if any existed in the original charter, or other law of this state, in favor of such railroad property or stock therein.

Acts 1877, ch. 12, §§ 2, 5; Shan., § 1514a1; Code 1932, § 2589; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-809.

65-8-109. Organization of new company by purchasers.

The purchasers at the sale mentioned in §§ 65-8-107 and 65-8-108 may, after being put in possession of the property, meet, adopt a name for the corporation to operate the railroad, and elect a board of directors, of their numbers, of not less than three (3), at least one (1) of whom shall reside in this state.

At such meeting, every person interested in the purchase shall be entitled to one (1) vote for every one hundred dollars ($100) of such interest, unless the number of votes to which each party shall be entitled, and the mode of representing the interest of the purchasers, shall have been previously agreed upon among the parties interested in the purchase.

The board of directors shall proceed to elect a president and such other officers as may be expedient for the proper management of the property, fix their compensation and duties, and adopt bylaws for the government of the company, not inconsistent with the laws of this state; and shall fix the amount of the capital stock of the company, and the amount of stock or bonds, or both, which shall represent the interest of the purchasers, dividing such stock into shares of one hundred dollars ($100) each.

The board of directors shall make a certificate showing the name of the corporation, the amount of its capital stock, the shares into which the same is divided, the number and residence of the board of directors, where the road lies, and the name or names by which it had theretofore been chartered and known, and shall cause the same to be signed by the president and the members of such board, and to be filed with the secretary of state; and thereupon the purchasers shall be a body corporate, under the name so adopted, with all the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, and franchises possessed under the laws of this state by the company or companies whose road and franchises were sold as aforementioned under the acts of incorporation thereof, or any amendments thereto, and any subsequent act or acts of this state; and with all the rights, powers, privileges, and franchises possessed by the corporation formed and organized for the building of railroads under this Code.

The board of directors shall issue, to the parties interested in the purchase of the railroads, shares of the capital stock thereof of one hundred dollars ($100) each, to such amount as the board of directors shall determine, in proportion to such interested parties' rights and interests in the property, which shares shall be fully paid, and not liable to calls; and also such bonds and obligations as the board of directors may determine.

Acts 1877, ch. 12, § 3; Shan., §§ 1515-1519; Code 1932, §§ 2590-2594; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-810 — 65-814.

Cross-References. Bond issues authorized, § 65-6-102.